Maine, session 132, LD2113.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3147, sub-§4, ¶D, as amended by PL 2025, c. 293, §4 and
affected by §8, is further amended by amending subparagraph (7) to read:
(7) Consideration of the use of low-voltage sensors to improve grid monitoring
capacity, including data related to grid power quality, transformer status and
distributed energy resource capacity by location; and
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3147, sub-§4, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 702, §8, is
amended to read:
E. Reference and incorporate, as appropriate, all relevant analysis conducted as part
of the State's climate action plan under Title 38, section 577 and relevant information
from reports and analysis completed by other state agencies and quasi-independent
state entities.; and
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3147, sub-§4, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. Be consistent with the relevant recommendations developed pursuant to section
3147-A.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3147-A is enacted to read:
§3147-A. Long-range grid planning
1. Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms have the following
meanings.
A. “Department” means the Department of Energy Resources.
B. “External expert” means an individual or entity with technical or policy expertise
in electric grid architecture, distributed energy resources, demand management and
flexibility, nonwires alternatives, capital-efficient planning or grid‑enhancing
technologies.
C. “Long-range grid plan” or “plan” means a 10-year plan developed by the
department and submitted to the commission for adoption that provides a roadmap for
modernization, reliability and resilience of the State’s electric grid and is consistent
with section 3147 and the state energy plan developed by the department pursuant to
section 10305, subsection 1.
2. Long-range grid plan. By August 1, 2026, and every 5 years thereafter, the
department shall develop a long-range grid plan as an adjunct to the state energy plan. The
long-range grid plan must be consistent with the integrated grid planning process
established under section 3147 and must include:
A. The integration of nonwires alternatives, demand management and flexibility and
distributed energy resources and grid-enhancing technologies;
B. An evaluation of modular, capital-efficient and performance-based investments that
maximize the value of existing electric grid assets before new capital expenditures are
authorized, consistent with the requirements of sections 3132-A, 3147 and 3195;
C. Strategies for climate adaptation, storm resilience, electrification and improved
hosting capacity; and
Page 1 - 132LR2851(01)

D. Measurable objectives and performance indicators for distribution system
modernization, capital efficiency and resilience.
In developing the plan, the department may engage consultants. To the greatest extent
practicable, the department shall engage consultants with knowledge of the State’s electric
grid or regulation of the electric industry in the State.
3. Expert input. In developing the plan, the department shall:
A. Convene technical advisory panels composed of external experts, as necessary, to
provide input on modeling, distributed energy resources integration, efficient use of
capital, demand management and flexibility and resilience strategies. The department
shall establish the scope and tasks of each technical advisory panel and ensure all
recommendations relevant to integrated distribution planning are included in the
planning docket submitted by the department to the commission for consideration of
adoption; and
B. Consult with the commission, the Public Advocate and the Efficiency Maine Trust.
4. Public input; stakeholder engagement. The department shall seek public input
and engage stakeholders throughout the process of developing the plan. The department
may hold stakeholder workshops, technical conferences or public hearings in order to
obtain input on the plan.
5. Commission implementation. The provisions of this subsection govern the
implementation of the long-range grid plan.
A. After receiving the completed plan from the department and providing for a notice
and comment period, the commission shall adopt the long-range grid plan by order.
B. All subsequent electric utility rate cases under sections 301 and 307, capital
investment plans under section 3132-A and integrated grid plans filed pursuant to
section 3147 must demonstrate consistency with the long-range grid plan developed by
the department and adopted by the commission.
C. The commission may initiate investigations and rulemaking necessary to ensure
consistency with the adopted plan. Rules adopted pursuant to this paragraph are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
The adoption of the plan by the commission does not constitute preapproval of any specific
project, investment or cost recovery. Each capital project or expenditure identified in the
plan remains subject to separate review and prudence determinations required under this
Title.
6. Performance-based regulatory mechanisms. The commission shall establish
performance-based regulatory mechanisms to align electric utility incentives with the long-
range grid plan. Performance-based regulatory mechanisms must include financial
incentives and penalties based on:
A. Verified nonwires alternative performance and investment deferral value;
B. Year-over-year improvements in distributed energy resource hosting capacity;
C. The deployment of light capital and grid-enhancing technologies;
D. Reliability and resilience benchmarks; and
Page 2 - 132LR2851(01)

E. Future total cost-of-service reductions.
7. Report. Within 3 months of the commission's adoption of a plan, the department,
in consultation with the commission, shall submit a report to the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy and utility matters that outlines the
process to develop the long-range grid plan as part of the state energy plan, an overview of
the long-range grid plan, any needed statutory changes and any other relevant information
the commission determines is necessary. The committee may report out a bill related to the
report.
Sec. 5. Performance-based regulatory mechanism proposals. An electric
utility shall file performance-based regulatory mechanism proposals along with the next
general rate case required following the adoption of the first long-range grid plan pursuant
to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section 3147-A.